src/main/resources/bg_BG.aff
SFX V Y 147
SFX V   да        шъл       .
SFX V   да        шлия      .
SFX V   да        шлият     .
SFX V   да        шла       .
SFX V   да        шлата     .
SFX V   да        шло       .
SFX V   да        шлото     .
SFX V   да        шли       .
SFX V   да        шлите     .
SFX V   га        гат       .
SFX V   га        гла       .
SFX V   га        глата     .
SFX V   га        гли       .
SFX V   га        глите     .
SFX V   га        глия      .
SFX V   га        глият     .
SFX V   га        гло       .
SFX V   га        глото     .
SFX V   га        гъл       .
SFX V   га        жа        .
SFX V   га        жах       .
SFX V   га        жаха      .
SFX V   га        жахме     .
SFX V   га        жахте     .
SFX V   га        же        .
SFX V   га        жейки     .
SFX V   га        жел       .
SFX V   га        жела      .
SFX V   га        желата    .
SFX V   га        жели      .
SFX V   га        желите    .
SFX V   га        желия     .
SFX V   га        желият    .
SFX V   га        жело      .
SFX V   га        желото    .
SFX V   га        жем       .
SFX V   га        жех       .
SFX V   га        жеха      .
SFX V   га        жехме     .
SFX V   га        жехте     .
SFX V   га        жеш       .
SFX V   га        жеше      .
SFX V   га        жещ       .
SFX V   га        жеща      .
SFX V   га        жещата    .
SFX V   га        жещи      .
SFX V   га        жещите    .
SFX V   га        жещия     .
SFX V   га        жещият    .
SFX V   га        жещо      .
SFX V   га        жещото    .
SFX V   а         ал        .
SFX V   а         ала       .
SFX V   а         алата     .
SFX V   а         али       .
SFX V   а         алите     .
SFX V   а         алия      .
SFX V   а         алият     .
SFX V   а         ало       .
SFX V   а         алото     .
SFX V   а         ат        .
SFX V   а         ах        .
SFX V   а         аха       .
SFX V   а         ахме      .
SFX V   а         ахте      .
SFX V   а         ащ        .
SFX V   а         аща       .
SFX V   а         ащата     .
SFX V   а         ащи       .
SFX V   а         ащите     .
SFX V   а         ащия      .
SFX V   а         ащият     .
SFX V   а         ащо       .
SFX V   а         ащото     .
SFX V   а         ейки      .
SFX V   а         ел        .
SFX V   а         ела       .
SFX V   а         елата     .
SFX V   а         ели       .
SFX V   а         елите     .
SFX V   а         елия      .
SFX V   а         елият     .
SFX V   а         ело       .
SFX V   а         елото     .
SFX V   а         ете       .
SFX V   а         ех        .
SFX V   а         еха       .
SFX V   а         ехме      .
SFX V   а         ехте      .
SFX V   а         еше       .
SFX V   а         и         .
SFX V   а         им        .
SFX V   а         ите       .
SFX V   а         иш        .
SFX V   я         ейки      .
SFX V   я         ели       .
SFX V   я         елите     .
SFX V   я         ен        .
SFX V   я         ена       .
SFX V   я         ената     .
SFX V   я         ени       .
SFX V   я         ените     .
SFX V   я         ения      .
SFX V   я         еният     .
SFX V   я         ено       .
SFX V   я         еното     .
SFX V   я         еше       .
SFX V   я         и         .
SFX V   я         ил        .
SFX V   я         ила       .
SFX V   я         илата     .
SFX V   я         или       .
SFX V   я         илите     .
SFX V   я         илия      .
SFX V   я         илият     .
SFX V   я         ило       .
SFX V   я         илото     .
SFX V   я         им        .
SFX V   я         ите       .
SFX V   я         их        .
SFX V   я         иха       .
SFX V   я         ихме      .
SFX V   я         ихте      .
SFX V   я         иш        .
SFX V   я         й         .
SFX V   я         йте       .
SFX V   я         ял        .
SFX V   я         яла       .
SFX V   я         ялата     .
SFX V   я         ялия      .
SFX V   я         ялият     .
SFX V   я         яло       .
SFX V   я         ялото     .
SFX V   я         ят        .
SFX V   я         ях        .
SFX V   я         яха       .
SFX V   я         яхме      .
SFX V   я         яхте      .
SFX V   я         ящ        .
SFX V   я         яща       .
SFX V   я         ящата     .
SFX V   я         ящи       .
SFX V   я         ящите     .
SFX V   я         ящия      .
SFX V   я         ящият     .
SFX V   я         ящо       .
SFX V   я         ящото     .

SFX W Y 97
SFX W   ея        ее        .
SFX W   ея        еейки     .
SFX W   ея        еел       .
SFX W   ея        еела      .
SFX W   ея        еелата    .
SFX W   ея        еели      .
SFX W   ея        еелите    .
SFX W   ея        еелия     .
SFX W   ея        еелият    .
SFX W   ея        еело      .
SFX W   ея        еелото    .
SFX W   ея        еем       .
SFX W   ея        еете      .
SFX W   ея        еех       .
SFX W   ея        ееха      .
SFX W   ея        еехме     .
SFX W   ея        еехте     .
SFX W   ея        ееш       .
SFX W   ея        ееше      .
SFX W   ея        еещ       .
SFX W   ея        ееща      .
SFX W   ея        еещата    .
SFX W   ея        еещи      .
SFX W   ея        еещите    .
SFX W   ея        еещия     .
SFX W   ея        еещият    .
SFX W   ея        еещо      .
SFX W   ея        еещото    .
SFX W   ея        ей        .
SFX W   ея        ейте      .
SFX W   ея        ели       .
SFX W   ея        елите     .
SFX W   ея        елия      .
SFX W   ея        елият     .
SFX W   ея        ети       .
SFX W   ея        етите     .
SFX W   ея        еят       .
SFX W   ея        я         .
SFX W   ея        ял        .
SFX W   ея        яла       .
SFX W   ея        ялата     .
SFX W   ея        яло       .
SFX W   ея        ялото     .
SFX W   ея        ят        .
SFX W   ея        ята       .
SFX W   ея        ятата     .
SFX W   ея        ятия      .
SFX W   ея        ятият     .
SFX W   ея        ято       .
SFX W   ея        ятото     .
SFX W   ея        ях        .
SFX W   ея        яха       .
SFX W   ея        яхме      .
SFX W   ея        яхте      .
SFX W   жа        жат       .
SFX W   жа        же        .
SFX W   жа        жел       .
SFX W   жа        жела      .
SFX W   жа        желата    .
SFX W   жа        жели      .
SFX W   жа        желите    .
SFX W   жа        желия     .
SFX W   жа        желият    .
SFX W   жа        жело      .
SFX W   жа        желото    .
SFX W   жа        жем       .
SFX W   жа        жете      .
SFX W   жа        жех       .
SFX W   жа        жеха      .
SFX W   жа        жехме     .
SFX W   жа        жехте     .
SFX W   жа        жеш       .
SFX W   жа        жеше      .
SFX W   жа        жи        .
SFX W   жа        за        .
SFX W   жа        зал       .
SFX W   жа        зала      .
SFX W   жа        залата    .
SFX W   жа        зали      .
SFX W   жа        залите    .
SFX W   жа        залия     .
SFX W   жа        залият    .
SFX W   жа        зало      .
SFX W   жа        залото    .
SFX W   жа        зан       .
SFX W   жа        зана      .
SFX W   жа        заната    .
SFX W   жа        зани      .
SFX W   жа        заните    .
SFX W   жа        зания     .
SFX W   жа        заният    .
SFX W   жа        зано      .
SFX W   жа        заното    .
SFX W   жа        зах       .
SFX W   жа        заха      .
SFX W   жа        захме     .
SFX W   жа        захте     .
